Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB457.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 510 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, is amended to read:Section 510. Containers To Be Labeled.--All persons, except as exempted by section five hundred two hereof, manufacturing, producing, distilling, developing or using in the process of 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 manufacture, denaturing, redistilling, recovering, rectifying, blending, reusing, holding in bond, holding in storage as bailee for hire, or transporting for hire of alcohol or liquor under the provisions of this article, shall securely and permanently attach to every container ready for shipment thereof as the same is manufactured, produced, distilled, developed, denatured, redistilled, recovered, rectified, blended, reused, a label stating the name of the manufacturer, kind and quantity of alcohol or liquor contained therein, and the date of its manufacture, together with the number of the license authorizing the manufacture thereof[,] and a conspicuous label with the words: "WARNING: There is a direct link between alcohol and fatal cancers," and all persons possessing such alcohol or liquor in wholesale quantities shall securely keep and maintain such [label] labels thereon.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0457PN0439 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516